Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
EVIDENCE OF SIMILAR TRANSACTIONS

16-10-301. Evidence of similar transactions - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that sexual offenses are a matter of grave statewide concern. These frequently occurring offenses are aggressive and assaultive violations of the well-being, privacy, and security of the victims, are severely contrary to common notions of proper behavior between people, and result in serious and long-lasting harm to individuals and society. These offenses often are not reported or are reported long after the offense for many reasons, including: The frequency with which the victims are vulnerable, such as young children who may be related to the perpetrator; the personal indignity, humiliation, and embarrassment involved in the offenses themselves; and the fear of further personal indignity, humiliation, and embarrassment in connection with investigation and prosecution. These offenses usually occur under circumstances in which there are no witnesses except for the accused and the victim, and, because of this and the frequent delays in reporting, there is often no evidence except for the conflicting testimony. Moreover, there is frequently a reluctance on the part of others to believe that the offenses occurred because of the inequality between the victim and the perpetrator, such as between the child victim and the adult accused, or because of the deviant and distasteful nature of the charges. In addition, it is recognized that some sex offenders cannot or will not respond to treatment or otherwise resist the impulses which motivate such conduct and that sex offenders are extremely habituated. As a result, such offenders often commit numerous offenses involving sexual deviance over many years, with the same or different victims, and often, but not necessarily, through similar methods or by common design. The general assembly reaffirms and reemphasizes that, in the prosecution of sexual offenses, including in proving the corpus delicti of such offenses, there is a greater need and propriety for consideration by the fact finder of evidence of other relevant acts of the accused, including any actions, crimes, wrongs, or transactions, whether isolated acts or ongoing actions and whether occurring prior to or after the charged offense. The general assembly finds that such evidence of other sexual acts is typically relevant and highly probative, and it is expected that normally the probative value of such evidence will outweigh any danger of unfair prejudice, even when incidents are remote from one another in time.

This section applies to prosecution for any offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), or first degree murder, as defined in section 18-3-102 (1)(d), C.R.S., in which the underlying felony on which the first degree murder charge is based is the commission or attempted commission of sexual assault, as described in section 18-3-402, C.R.S., sexual assault in the first or second degree as those offenses were described in sections 18-3-402 and 18-3-403, C.R.S., as they existed prior to July 1, 2000, or the commission of a class 3 felony for sexual assault on a child as defined in section 18-3-405 (2), C.R.S.

The prosecution may introduce evidence of other acts of the defendant to prove the commission of the offense as charged for any purpose other than propensity, including: Refuting defenses, such as consent or recent fabrication; showing a common plan, scheme, design, or modus operandi, regardless of whether identity is at issue and regardless of whether the charged offense has a close nexus as part of a unified transaction to the other act; showing motive, opportunity, intent, preparation, including grooming of a victim, knowledge, identity, or absence of mistake or accident; or for any other matter for which it is relevant. The prosecution may use such evidence either as proof in its case in chief or in rebuttal, including in response to evidence of the defendant's good character.

If the prosecution intends to introduce evidence of other acts of the defendant pursuant to this section, the following procedures shall apply:

The prosecution shall advise the trial court and the defendant in advance of trial of the other act or acts and the purpose or purposes for which the evidence is offered.

The trial court shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence whether the other act occurred and whether the purpose is proper under the broad inclusionary expectations of this section.

The trial court may determine the admissibility of other acts by an offer of proof.

The trial court shall, at the time of the reception into evidence of other acts and again in the general charge to the jury, direct the jury as to the limited purpose or purposes for which the evidence is admitted and for which the jury may consider it.

The court in instructing the jury, and the parties when making statements in the presence of the jury, shall use the words "other act or transaction" and at no time shall refer to "other offense", "other crime", or other terms with a similar connotation.

The procedural requirements of this section shall not apply when the other acts are presented to prove that the offense was committed as part of a pattern of sexual abuse under section 18-3-405 (2)(d), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 614, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 622, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 605, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1578, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 701, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1182, § 7, effective July 1; (4)(c) amended, p. 761, § 10, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the admissibility of evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts, see C.R.E. 404(b).